District of Columbia statutes.
4-1371.11

Unlawful disclosure of information; penalties.

Whoever discloses, receives, makes use of, or knowingly permits the use of information concerning a deceased child or other person in violation of this subchapter shall be subject to a fine of not more than $1,000. Violations of this subchapter shall be prosecuted by the Corporation Counsel or his or her designee in the name of the District of Columbia. Subject to the availability of an appropriation for this purpose, any fines collected pursuant to this section shall be used by the Committee to fund its activities.

History

Oct. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 14-28, § 4611, 48 DCR 6981

Temporary Addition of Section

For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 2 of Child Fatality Review Committee Establishment Temporary Act of 2001 (D.C. Law 14-20, September 6, 2001, law notification 48 DCR 9090).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 11 of Child Fatality Review Committee Establishment Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-40, April 25, 2001, 48 DCR 5917).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 11 of Child Fatality Review Committee Establishment Legislative Review Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-82, July 9, 2001, 48 DCR 6355).